Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-719
Act, how cited.

Sections 48-719 to 48-743 shall be known and may be cited as the Boiler Inspection Act.

Laws 1987, LB 462, § 1;

Laws 1988, LB 863, § 1;

Laws 1995, LB 438, § 1.